New Jersey, session 222, A1200.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, as a condition of securing a new or renewal license or approval, the Department of Children and Families shall require a child care center to establish a procedure to notify the parent or guardian of a child enrolled at the center in the event of the childs unexcused absence and to determine the reason for the absence pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2020, c.152 (C.30:5B-15.2). b.    The department shall not issue a regular license or approval to a center until the department determines that the center has established the notification procedures specified in subsection a. of this section. c.    The department shall deny, revoke or refuse to renew the center's license or approval, as appropriate, if the department determines that a center has not established the notification procedures specified in subsection a. of this section. 2.    The Department of Children and Families shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.